Hawaii statutes.
§302D-32 Annual audit or financial review.
Each charter school shall annually complete an independent financial audit
that complies with the requirements of its authorizer and the department;
provided that the authorizer shall have the discretion to allow a financial
review in lieu of an independent financial audit. [L 2013, c 159, pt of §1; am
L 2014, c 99, §22]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next